Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7709
Scoring models or processes; filing.

Insurers that use insurance scores to underwrite and rate risks shall file their scoring models or other scoring processes with the Department of Insurance. A third party may file scoring models on behalf of insurers. A filing that includes insurance scoring may include loss experience justifying the use of credit information. Any filing relating to credit information is considered a trade secret.

Laws 2003, LB 487, § 9.